South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S468.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 7-7-1000(A)(2) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (2) The total number of registered voters within the municipality in each group of pooled precincts cannot exceed one thousand five hundred. three thousand. SECTION 2.  Section 7-7-1000(B)(2) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (2) The total number of registered voters within the municipality in each group of pooled precincts cannot exceed three five thousand. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----